North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7A. Judicial Department.
Article 13. Creation and Organization of the District Court Division.

§ 7A-130.
Creation of district court division and district court districts; seats of court.

The district court division of the General Court of Justice is hereby created. It consists of various district courts organized in territorial districts. The numbers and boundaries of the districts are as provided by

G.S. 7A-133

. The district court shall sit in the county seat of each county, and at such additional places in each county as the General Assembly may authorize, except that sessions of court are not required at an additional seat of court unless the chief district judge and the Administrative Officer of the Courts concur in a finding that the facilities are adequate.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, when exigent circumstances exist within a judicial district, sessions of district court may be conducted at a location outside a county seat by order of the chief district court judge of a county, with the prior approval of the location and facilities by the Administrative Officer of the Courts and after consultation with the clerk of superior court and county officials of the county. An order entered under this subsection shall be filed in the office of the clerk of superior court in the county and posted at the courthouse within the county seat and notice shall be posted in other conspicuous locations.

History.

1965, c. 310, s. 1; 1987, c. 509, s. 14; c. 738, s. 124; 2018-138, s. 2.12(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2018-138, s. 2.12(b), effective December 3, 2018, added the designation for subsection (a), and added subsection (b).

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “The District Court and the Ongoing Pursuit of Local Justice in North Carolina,” see 43 Campbell L. Rev. 3 (2021).

§ 7A-131.
Establishment of district courts.

District courts are established, within districts, in accordance with the following schedule:

On the first Monday in December, 1966, the first, the twelfth, the fourteenth, the sixteenth, the twenty-fifth, and the thirtieth districts;

On the first Monday in December, 1968, the second, the third, the fourth, the fifth, the sixth, the seventh, the eighth, the ninth, the tenth, the eleventh, the thirteenth, the fifteenth, the eighteenth, the twentieth, the twenty-first, the twenty-fourth, the twenty-sixth, the twenty-seventh, and the twenty-ninth districts;

On the first Monday in December, 1970, the seventeenth, the nineteenth, the twenty-second, the twenty-third, and the twenty-eighth districts.

History.

1965, c. 310, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Some Aspects of the Criminal Court Process in North Carolina,” see 49 N.C.L. Rev. 469 (1971).

§ 7A-132.
Judges, district attorneys, full-time assistant district attorneys and magistrates for district court districts.

Each district court district shall have one or more judges and one district attorney. Each county within each district shall have at least one magistrate.

For each district the General Assembly shall prescribe the numbers of district judges, and the numbers of full-time assistant district attorneys. For each county within each district the General Assembly shall prescribe a minimum number of magistrates.

History.

1965, c. 310, s. 1; 1967, c. 1049, s. 5; 1973, c. 47, s. 2; 2006-187, s. 7(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-187, s. 7(b), effective July 1, 2006, deleted “and a maximum” preceding “number of magistrates” at the end of the second paragraph.

§ 7A-133.
Numbers of judges by districts; numbers of magistrates and additional seats of court, by counties. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

Each district court district shall have the numbers of judges as set forth in the following table:

Click to view

For district court districts of less than a whole county, or with part or all of one county with part of another, the composition of the district is as follows:

District Court District 9 consists of Person, Franklin and Granville Counties and the remainder of Vance County not in District Court District 9B.

District Court District 9B consists of Warren County and VTD EH1, VTD MIDD, VTD NH1, VTD NH2, VTD TWNS, VTD WMSB of Vance County.

(Repealed effective January 1, 2025 – see notes) District Court District 20C consists of the remainder of Union County not in District Court District 20B.

(Repealed effective January 1, 2025 – see notes) District Court District 20B consists of Precinct 01: Tract 204.01: Block Group 2: Block 2040, Block 2057, Block 2058, Block 2060, Block 2061, Block 2062, Block 2064, Block 2065; Tract 204.02: Block Group 2: Block 2001, Block 2002, Block 2003, Block 2004, Block 2005, Block 2006, Block 2007, Block 2008, Block 2009, Block 2010, Block 2011, Block 2012, Block 2013, Block 2014, Block 2015, Block 2016, Block 2017, Block 2018, Block 2023, Block 2024, Block 2025, Block 2026, Block 2027, Block 2028, Block 2029, Block 2030, Block 2031, Block 2032, Block 2033, Block 2034; Block Group 3: Block 3000, Block 3003, Block 3004, Block 3005, Block 3006, Block 3007, Block 3008, Block 3009, Block 3010, Block 3011, Block 3012, Block 3013, Block 3014, Block 3015, Block 3016, Block 3017, Block 3018, Block 3019, Block 3020, Block 3021, Block 3022, Block 3023, Block 3024, Block 3025, Block 3026, Block 3027, Block 3028, Block 3029, Block 3030, Block 3031, Block 3032, Block 3033, Block 3034, Block 3035, Block 3036, Block 3037, Block 3038, Block 3039, Block 3040, Block 3041, Block 3042, Block 3043, Block 3044, Block 3045, Block 3046, Block 3047; Block Group 4: Block 4035, Block 4054, Block 4055; Precinct 02: Tract 205: Block Group 1: Block 1000, Block 1001, Block 1002, Block 1003, Block 1004, Block 1005, Block 1006, Block 1007, Block 1009, Block 1010, Block 1011, Block 1012, Block 1013, Block 1014, Block 1015, Block 1016, Block 1017, Block 1018, Block 1019, Block 1020, Block 1021, Block 1022, Block 1023, Block 1037, Block 1038; Block Group 2: Block 2081, Block 2082, Block 2092, Block 2099, Block 2100, Block 2101, Block 2102; Tract 206: Block Group 3: Block 3036, Block 3038, Block 3039, Block 3040, Block 3048; Block Group 4: Block 4053; Precinct 03, Precinct 04, Precinct 06: Tract 202.02: Block Group 1: Block 1012, Block 1013, Block 1014, Block 1015, Block 1017, Block 1018, Block 1021, Block 1022, Block 1023; Tract 204.01: Block Group 2: Block 2000, Block 2001, Block 2002, Block 2003, Block 2004, Block 2005, Block 2033, Block 2034, Block 2035, Block 2036, Block 2041, Block 2042, Block 2043, Block 2044, Block 2045, Block 2056, Block 2063, Block 2999; Precinct 08, Precinct 09, Precinct 10, Precinct 13, Precinct 23: Tract 206: Block Group 4: Block 4051; Precinct 25: Tract 206: Block Group 4: Block 4036; Precinct 34, Precinct 36, Precinct 43 of Union County.

District 10A: Wake County: VTD 01-42, VTD 01-47, VTD 02-01, VTD 02-02, VTD 02-03, VTD 02-04, VTD 02-05, VTD 02-06, VTD 07-02, VTD 07-06, VTD 07-07, VTD 08-04, VTD 08-05, VTD 08-07, VTD 09-01, VTD 09-03, VTD 10-01, VTD 13-10, VTD 13-11, VTD 14-01, VTD 14-02, VTD 19-03, VTD 19-04, VTD 19-05, VTD 19-06, VTD 19-07, VTD 19-09, VTD 19-10, VTD 19-11, VTD 19-12.

District 10B: Wake County: VTD 09-02, VTD 10-02, VTD 10-03, VTD 10-04, VTD 13-01, VTD 13-07, VTD 13-08, VTD 13-09, VTD 16-08, VTD 17-02, VTD 17-03, VTD 17-04, VTD 17-06, VTD 17-07, VTD 17-08, VTD 17-09, VTD 17-11, VTD 19-16, VTD 19-17.

District 10C: Wake County: VTD 01-04, VTD 01-09, VTD 01-10, VTD 01-12, VTD 01-13, VTD 01-14, VTD 01-15, VTD 01-17, VTD 01-18, VTD 01-28, VTD 01-30, VTD 01-34, VTD 01-36, VTD 01-37, VTD 01-38, VTD 01-39, VTD 01-43, VTD 01-44, VTD 01-45, VTD 01-46, VTD 01-51, VTD 07-03, VTD 07-04, VTD 07-05, VTD 07-09, VTD 07-11, VTD 07-12, VTD 07-13, VTD 08-02, VTD 08-06, VTD 08-09, VTD 13-02, VTD 13-05, VTD 13-06, VTD 17-01, VTD 17-05, VTD 17-10.

District 10D: Wake County: VTD 01-01, VTD 01-02, VTD 01-03, VTD 01-05, VTD 01-06, VTD 01-07, VTD 01-11, VTD 01-16, VTD 01-29, VTD 01-33, VTD 01-49, VTD 04-01, VTD 04-02, VTD 04-03, VTD 04-04, VTD 04-05, VTD 04-06, VTD 04-07, VTD 04-08, VTD 04-09, VTD 04-10, VTD 04-11, VTD 04-12, VTD 04-14, VTD 04-15, VTD 04-16, VTD 04-17, VTD 04-18, VTD 04-20, VTD 04-21, VTD 05-05, VTD 06-05, VTD 06-07, VTD 07-01, VTD 07-10, VTD 08-03, VTD 08-08, VTD 08-10, VTD 08-11, VTD 11-01, VTD 11-02, VTD 12-01, VTD 12-02, VTD 12-04, VTD 12-05, VTD 12-06, VTD 12-07, VTD 12-09, VTD 15-01, VTD 15-02, VTD 15-03, VTD 15-04, VTD 16-01, VTD 16-05, VTD 16-09, VTD 18-02, VTD 18-03, VTD 18-05, VTD 20-03, VTD 20-05, VTD 20-09.

District 10E: Wake County: VTD 01-19, VTD 01-20, VTD 01-21, VTD 01-22, VTD 01-23, VTD 01-25, VTD 01-26, VTD 01-27, VTD 01-31, VTD 01-32, VTD 01-35, VTD 01-40, VTD 01-41, VTD 01-48, VTD 01-50, VTD 16-02, VTD 16-03, VTD 16-04, VTD 16-06, VTD 16-07, VTD 18-01, VTD 18-04, VTD 18-06, VTD 18-07, VTD 18-08.

District 10F: Wake County: VTD 03-00, VTD 04-13, VTD 04-19, VTD 05-01, VTD 05-03, VTD 05-04, VTD 05-06, VTD 06-01, VTD 06-04, VTD 06-06, VTD 12-08, VTD 20-01, VTD 20-02, VTD 20-04, VTD 20-06, VTD 20-08, VTD 20-10, VTD 20-11, VTD 20-12.

through (18) Repealed by Session Laws 2020-84, s. 2(a), effective January 1, 2021.The names and boundaries of voting tabulation districts specified for Wake County, and Vance County in this section are as shown on the 2010 Census Redistricting TIGER/Line Shapefiles. Precinct boundaries for Union County are those shown on the Legislative Services Office’s redistricting computer database on January 1, 2005; and for other counties are those reported by the United States Bureau of the Census under Public Law 94-171 for the 1990 Census in the IVTD Version of the TIGER files.

(b1)

The qualified voters of District Court District 11 shall elect all eight judges established for the District in subsection (a) of this section, but only persons who reside in Johnston County may be candidates for five of the judgeships, only persons who reside in Harnett County may be candidates for two of the judgeships, and only persons who reside in Lee County may be candidates for the remaining judgeship.

(b2)

The qualified voters of District Court District 13 shall elect all six judges established for the District in subsection (a) of this section, but only persons who reside in Bladen County may be candidates for one of those judgeships, only persons who reside in Columbus County may be candidates for two of those judgeships, and only persons who reside in Brunswick County may be candidates for three of those judgeships. These district court judgeships shall be numbered and assigned for residency purposes as follows:

(1)

Seat number one, established for residents of Brunswick County by this section, shall be the seat currently held by Judge Barefoot.

(2)

Seat number two, established for residents of Brunswick County by this section, shall be the seat currently held by Judge Fairley.

(3)

Seat number three, established for residents of Brunswick County by this section, shall be the seat currently held by Judge Warren.

(4)

Seat number four, established for residents of Columbus County by this section, shall be the seat currently held by Judge Jolly.

(5)

Seat number five, established for residents of Columbus County by this section, shall be the seat currently held by Judge Tyler.

(6)

Seat number six, established for residents of Bladen County by this section, shall be the seat currently held by Judge Ussery.

(b3)

The qualified voters of District Court District 22A shall elect all five judges established for the District in subsection (a) of this section, but only persons who reside in Alexander County may be candidates for two of the judgeships, and only persons who reside in Iredell County may be candidates for three of the judgeships.

(b4)

The qualified voters of District Court District 22B shall elect all six judges established for the District in subsection (a) of this section, but only persons who reside in Davie County may be candidates for two of the judgeships, and only persons who reside in Davidson County may be candidates for four of the judgeships.

(b5)

The qualified voters of District 16A shall elect all judges established for District 16A in subsection (a) of this section, but only persons who reside in Anson County may be candidates for one of the judgeships, only persons who reside in Scotland County may be candidates for one of the judgeships, and only persons who reside in Richmond County may be candidates for the remaining judgeships. In order to implement this section the following shall apply in order to transition from at large seats to residency requirements:

(1)

In 2020, and every four years thereafter, the district court judgeship requiring a resident of Anson County shall be elected, and a district court judgeship requiring a resident of Richmond County shall be elected.

(2)

In 2022, and every four years thereafter, the district court judgeship requiring a resident of Scotland County shall be elected, and a district court judgeship requiring a resident of Richmond County shall be elected.

(b6)

(Effective until January 1, 2023)

The qualified voters of District 20A shall elect all judges established for District 20A in subsection (a) of this section, but only persons who reside in Montgomery County may be candidates for one of the judgeships, and only persons who reside in Montgomery or Stanly County may be candidates for the remaining judgeships.

(b7)

Subject to the provisions of this subsection, the qualified voters of District 25 shall elect all judges established for District 25 in subsection (a) of this section, but only persons who reside in Catawba County may be candidates for five of the judgeships, and only persons who reside in Burke or Caldwell County may be candidates for the remaining judgeships. In order to implement this section the following shall apply in order to transition from at large seats to residency requirements:

(1)

Transition of seats; regular elections. —

For any district court judgeship that is held by a resident of Burke or Caldwell Counties on July 1, 2018, at the next general election after July 1, 2018, that district court judgeship shall be filled only by a person who is a resident of Burke or Caldwell Counties. Until such time as three district court judgeships transition under subdivision (2) of this subsection, for any district court judgeship that is held by a resident of Catawba County on July 1, 2018, that district court judgeship shall, at the next general election after July 1, 2018, be filled only by a person who is a resident of Burke, Caldwell, or Catawba County.

(2)

Transition of seats; vacancies. —

Upon each of the first three district court judgeship vacancies occurring in District Court District 25 after July 1, 2018, due to death, resignation, removal, or retirement of a person who is a resident of Catawba County holding a judgeship on July 1, 2018, that vacancy shall be filled according to law for the remainder of the unfilled term. At the next general election held for that district court judgeship, only persons who reside in Burke or Caldwell County may be candidates for that district court judgeship. Any primary associated with that general election for that district court judgeship after the completion of the term shall also be held accordingly, in accordance with this subsection.

(3)

Notification to State Board. —

Upon each of the first three district court judgeship vacancies occurring after July 1, 2018, in District Court District 25 due to the death, resignation, removal, or retirement of a person who is a resident of Catawba County holding a judgeship on July 1, 2018, the Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts shall provide written notice of the vacancy to the State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement. During the filing period for that district court judgeship at the next general election held for that district court judgeship, the State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement shall ensure that only persons who reside in Burke or Caldwell County may file as candidates for that district court judgeship in accordance [with] this subsection.

(4)

Final transition. —

If a total of three district court judgeships have not transferred under subdivision (2) of this subsection to be eligible to be held by only persons who are residents of Burke or Caldwell Counties by January 1, 2030, a sufficient number of district court judgeships to total three district court judgeships shall be transferred to be held by only persons who are residents of Burke or Caldwell Counties on January 1, 2031, and the 2030 elections shall be held accordingly.

Each county shall have the numbers of magistrates and additional seats of district court, as set forth in the following table:

Click to view

District Judges County 1 5 Camden Chowan Currituck Dare Gates Pasquotank Perquimans 2 4 Martin Beaufort Tyrrell Hyde Washington 3A 6 Pitt 3B 6 Craven Pamlico Carteret 4 9 Sampson Duplin Jones Onslow 5 9 New Hanover Pender 6 4 Northampton Bertie Hertford Halifax 7 7 Nash Edgecombe Wilson 8 6 Wayne Greene Lenoir 9 5 Granville (part of Vance see subsection (b)) Franklin Person 9B 2 Warren 10A 3 (part of Vance see subsection (b)) 10B 3 (part of Wake see subsection (b)) 10C 3 (part of Wake see subsection (b)) 10D 5 (part of Wake see subsection (b)) 10E 3 (part of Wake see subsection (b)) 10F 3 (part of Wake see subsection (b)) 11 11 Harnett Johnston Lee 12 10 Cumberland 13 6 Bladen Brunswick Columbus 14 7 Durham 15A 4 Alamance 15B 5 Orange Chatham 16A 4 Scotland Anson Richmond 16B 6 Robeson 17A 4 Caswell Rockingham 17B 4 Stokes Surry 18 14 Guilford 19A 6 Cabarrus 19B 5 Randolph 19C 5 Rowan 19D 4 Hoke, Moore 20A 3 Montgomery, Stanly 20B 1 (part of Union see subsection (b)) 20C 2 (part of Union see subsection (b)) 20D 2 Union 21 11 Forsyth 22A 6 Alexander Iredell 22B 6 Davidson Davie 23 4 Alleghany Ashe Wilkes Yadkin 24 4 Avery Madison Mitchell Watauga Yancey 25 10 Burke Caldwell Catawba 26 21 Mecklenburg 27A 7 Gaston 27B 6 Cleveland Lincoln 28 7 Buncombe 29A 4 McDowell Rutherford 29B 4 Henderson Polk Transylvania 30 6 Cherokee Clay Graham Haywood Jackson Macon Swain.

Magistrates Additional County Min. Seats of Court Camden 3 Chowan 3 Currituck 3 Dare 5 Gates 2 Pasquotank 4 Perquimans 4 Martin 3 Beaufort 4 Tyrrell 3 Hyde 3.5 Washington 3 Pitt 11.5 Farmville Ayden Craven 8 Havelock Pamlico 3 Carteret 6 Sampson 5 Duplin 4 Jones 2 Onslow 11 New Hanover 12 Pender 4.8 Halifax 7 Roanoke Rapids, Scotland Neck Northampton 3 Bertie 3 Hertford 3 Nash 9 Rocky Mount Edgecombe 7 Rocky Mount Wilson 7 Wayne 9 Mount Olive Greene 3 Lenoir 7 La Grange Granville 5 Vance 6 Warren 3 Franklin 4 Person 4 Caswell 3 Wake 18.5 Apex, Wendell, Fuquay-Varina, Wake Forest Harnett 8 Dunn Johnston 10 Benson, Clayton, Selma Lee 5 Cumberland 19 Bladen 3 Brunswick 8 Columbus 5 Tabor City Durham 13 Alamance 12 Burlington Orange 7 Chapel Hill Chatham 4 Siler City Scotland 5 Hoke 3 Robeson 12 Fairmont, Maxton, Pembroke, Red Springs, Rowland, St. Pauls Rockingham 7 Reidsville, Eden, Madison Stokes 3 Surry 6 Mt. Airy Guilford 25.4 High Point Cabarrus 9 Kannapolis Montgomery 3 Randolph 9 Liberty Rowan 9 Stanly 5 Union 9 Anson 3 Richmond 5 Hamlet Moore 6 Southern Pines Forsyth 16 Kernersville Alexander 3 Davidson 9 Thomasville Davie 3 Iredell 9 Mooresville Alleghany 2 Ashe 3 Wilkes 6 Yadkin 3 Avery 3 Madison 3 Mitchell 3 Watauga 4 Yancey 3 Burke 5.6 Caldwell 6 Catawba 10 Hickory Mecklenburg 26.50 Gaston 17 Cleveland 7 Lincoln 5 Buncombe 15 Henderson 6.5 McDowell 3 Polk 3 Rutherford 6 Transylvania 3 Cherokee 3 Clay 2 Graham 2 Haywood 5 Canton Jackson 3 Macon 3 Swain 3

History.

1965, c. 310, s. 1; 1967, c. 691, s. 8; 1969, c. 1190, s. 10; c. 1254; 1971, c. 377, s. 7; cc. 727, 840, 841, 842, 843, 865, 866, 898; 1973, cc. 132, 373, 483; c. 838, s. 1; c. 1376; 1975, c. 956, ss. 8, 10; 1977, cc. 121, 122; c. 678, s. 2; c. 947, s. 1; c. 1130, ss. 4, 5; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1238, s. 3; c. 1243, ss. 3, 6; 1979, c. 465; c. 838, ss. 117, 118; c. 1072, ss. 2, 3; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1221, s. 2; 1981, c. 964, s. 4; 1983, c. 881, s. 5; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1109, s. 5; 1985, c. 698, ss. 7(a), 12; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1014, s. 222; 1987, c. 738, ss. 126(a), 130(a); 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1056, s. 4; c. 1075; c. 1100, s. 17.2(a); 1989, c. 795, s. 23(a), (d), (h); 1991, c. 742, ss. 11, 12(a); 1993, c. 321, ss. 200.4(e), 200.6(a), (d); 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 769, s. 24.9; 1995, c. 507, s. 21.1(c); 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 589, s. 2(a); 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, ss. 22.4, 22.7(a); 1997-443, ss. 18.12(a), 18.13; 1998-212, ss. 16.11, 16.16(a); 1998-217, s. 67.3(a); 1999-237, ss. 17.4, 17.6(a); 2000-67, ss. 15.2, 15.3(a); 2001-400, s. 1; 2001-424, ss. 22.16, 22.17(a); 2003-284, s. 13.8; 2004-124, ss. 14.1(a), 14.6(e); 2005-276, s. 14.2(f), (f1); 2005-345, s. 27(a), (b); 2006-66, ss. 14.4(a), 14.5; 2006-96, s. 1; 2006-187, s. 7(a); 2006-221, s. 14(a); 2006-264, s. 93(a); 2007-323, ss. 14.13(a), (d), 14.25(e), (f); 2007-484, s. 25(a), 36; 2008-107, s. 14.13(a); 2009-341, s. 1; 2012-194, s. 1(c), (d); 2013-360, s. 18B.22(f); 2016-94, s. 19B.3(a); 2017-57, s. 18B.9(c); 2018-14, s. 2(a); 2018-121, s. 2(a); 2019-229, s. 2(a); 2020-84, s. 2(a); 2021-148, s. 1; 2021-180, s. 16.7(c).

Section Set Out Multiple Times.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For versions of this section in effect from January 1, 2023 until January 1, 2025, and in effect January 1, 2025, see the following sections, also numbered

G.S. 7A-133

.

Reduction in Minimum Magistrate Positions.

Section 15.14 of Session Laws 2010-31, as added by Session Laws
2010-123, s. 6.4, effective July 1, 2010, provides: “Notwithstanding any other provision of law relating to the number of positions in the Judicial Department, during the 2009-2011 biennium, the Administrative Office of the Courts may reduce positions in the Judicial Department to comply with budget reductions taken by action of the General Assembly for that Department. The Administrative Office of the Courts shall report to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations, to the Fiscal Research Division of the General Assembly, and to the Revisor of Statutes, on any reductions taken that affect statutory staffing numbers in Chapter 7A of the General Statutes.”

John Smith, Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts, reported to the Revisor of Statutes et al. by memorandum dated June 30, 2011, that the minimum number of magistrates per county has been modified as shown in the following chart (the minimum number of magistrates for counties not listed in the chart remains as set out in the section above).

County
FTE Currently Listed in Statute Minimum Magistrate Positions effective 7/01/2011
Minimum Magistrate Positions effective 1/1/2013 ———————————————————————————————- ——————— Alexander 4 4 3 Anson 5 4 3 Ashe 4 3 3 Avery 4 4 3 Beaufort 5.05 5 4 Bertie 5 3 3 Bladen 5 4 3 Brunswick 9 9 8 Burke 6.75 5.6 5.6 Caldwell 7 6 6 Carteret 9 7 6 Caswell 4 3 3 Chatham 6 4 4 Cherokee 4 4 3 Cleveland 8 7 7 Columbus 9.5 7.5 5 Craven 10 8 8 Currituck 4 4 3 Dare 6 6 4 Davidson 10 8 8 Davie 4 3 3 Duplin 8 4 4 Franklin 7 7 4 Granville 7 6.75 5 Greene 4 4 3 Halifax 12 7 7 Harnett 10 8 8 Haywood 6.75 6 5 Hertford 6 5 3 Hoke 5 3 3 Jackson 5 4 3 Johnston 11 10 10 Lee 5.5 5 5 Lincoln 6 6 5 Macon 3.5 3.5 3 Madison 4 4 3 Martin 4 4 3 McDowell 4.5 4 3 Mitchell 4 4 3 Montgomery 5 4 3 Moore 6.5 5 5 Northampton 5.25 5.25 3 Orange 9 7 7 Pasquotank 5 4 4 Pender 4.8 3.8 3.8 Polk 4 4 3 Randolph 10 9 9 Richmond 6 5 5 Robeson 15 13 12 Rockingham 9 7 7 Rutherford 7 6 6 Sampson 7 6 5 Stanly 6 5 5 Stokes 5 5 3 Surry 9 9 6 Swain 3.75 3 3 Transylvania 4 4 3 Warren 3.5 3.5 3 Washington 4 3 3 Watauga 5 4 4 Yadkin 4 3 3

Click to view

Information on receipt of preclearance was published in the
North Carolina Register.

Session Laws
1995, c. 507, s. 21.1(h), provides in part that c. 507, s. 21.1(c) and (d) become effective January 1, 1996, or 15 days after the date upon which those subsections are approved under section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, whichever is later.
Preclearance was received from the U.S. Department of Justice by letter dated November 8, 1995.

Session Laws 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 589, s. 5, provides that c. 589, s. 2 becomes effective January 1, 1997, or the date upon which that section is approved under section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, whichever is later. Preclearance was received from the U.S. Department of Justice by letter dated December 16, 1996.

Session Laws 1996, Second Extra Session, c. 18, s. 22.7(c), provides that the amendment by Session Laws 1996, Second Extra Session, c. 18, s. 22.7, becomes effective December 15, 1996, as to any district court district where no county is subject to section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965.
As to any district court district where any county is subject to section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, the amendment becomes effective December 15, 1996, or 15 days after the date upon which it is approved under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, whichever is later.
Preclearance was received from the U.S. Department of Justice by letter dated November 25, 1996.

Session Laws
1997-443, s. 18.12(a), which amended subsection (a), provides in s. 18.12(c): “Subsection (a) of this section becomes effective December 1, 1997, as to any district where no county is subject to Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965. As to any district where any county is subject to Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, subsection (a) of this section becomes effective December 1, 1997, or 15 days after the date upon which that subsection is approved under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act.” Preclearance was received from the U.S. Department of Justice by letter dated December 8, 1997.

Session Laws
1998-212, s. 16.16(c), provides that subsection (a) of that section becomes effective December 15, 1998, as to any district where no county is subject to section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965 and, as to any district where any county is subject to section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, subsection (a) becomes effective December 15, 1998, or 15 days after the date upon which the subsection is approved under section 5 of the Voting Rights Act. Preclearance was received from the U.S. Department of Justice.

Session Laws
1999-237, s. 17.6(c), provides that subsection (a) of this section becomes effective January 1, 2000, as to any district in which no county is subject to section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965. As to any district in which any county is subject to section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, subsection (a) becomes effective January 1, 2000, or 15 days after the date upon which that subsection is approved under section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, whichever is later. Preclearance was received from the U.S. Department of Justice by letter dated September 27, 1999.

Session Laws
2000-67, s. 15.3(c), made subsection (a) of this section effective December 15, 2000, as to any district in which no county is subject to section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965 (Act) and, as to any district in which any county is subject to section 5 of the Act, December 15, 2000, or 15 days after the date upon which that subsection is approved under section 5 of the Act, whichever is later. Preclearance was received from the U.S. Department of Justice by letter dated October 26, 2000.

Session Laws
2001-400, s. 5, provided that c. 400 becomes effective July 1, 2002, or the date upon which c. 400 is approved under section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, whichever is later. Preclearance was received from the U.S. Department of Justice by letter dated June 21, 2002.

Session Laws
2001-424, s. 22.17(c), provides: “This section becomes effective January 1, 2002, except that the elimination of the vacant judgeship in District Court District 17A is effective the later of January 1, 2002, or the date upon which it is approved under section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965.”

Session Laws
2005-276, s. 14.2(q), provides, in part: “With respect to the division of District Court District 20, subsections (f) through (k) of this section become effective December 1, 2005, or the date upon which subsection (f) of this section is approved under section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, whichever is later. With respect to the division of District Court District 29, subsections (f) through (k) of this section become effective December 1, 2005.” Preclearance was received from the U.S. Department of Justice by letter dated January 5, 2006.

Session Laws
2006-66, s. 14.4(c), provides: “This section becomes effective January 15, 2007, as to any district court district not subject to section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965. As to any district court district subject to section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, it becomes effective January 15, 2007, or the date upon which the additional judge added for that district by subsection (a) of this section is approved under section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, whichever is later.”

Session Laws
2006-96, s. 5, provides in part: “Section 1 of this act, which added subsection (b2), becomes effective October 1, 2006, or the date upon which Section 1 of this act is approved under section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, whichever is later.” Preclearance was received by letter dated December 21, 2006.

Session Laws
2007-323, s. 14.13(b), provides: “The Governor shall appoint the additional district court judges authorized by subsection (a) of this section. Those judges’ successors shall be elected in the 2008 general election for four-year terms commencing January 1, 2009.”

Session Laws
2007-323, s. 14.13(c), provides: “As to Districts 11, 12, and 18, subsection (a) of this section becomes effective January 1, 2008, or 15 days after preclearance under section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, whichever is later. All other portions of subsection (a) and subsection (b) of this section become effective January 1, 2008.”

Session Laws
2008-107, s. 14.13(c), provides: “As to District 11, subsection (a) of this section becomes effective January 15, 2009, or 15 days after preclearance under section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, whichever is later. The remainder of this section becomes effective January 15, 2009.” Preclearance was received December 4, 2008.

Session Laws
2009-341, s. 2, provides that the amendment by section 1 of the act becomes effective on the date upon which it is approved under section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965. Preclearance was received January 7, 2010.